Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB435.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6.6(d) of the act of January 8, 1960 (1959 P.L.2119, No.787), known as the Air Pollution Control Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 6.6. Hazardous Air Pollutants.--* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (d) * * *(4) For cement plants regulated under 40 CFR Pt. 63 Subpt. LLL (relating to national emission standards for hazardous air pollutants from the Portland cement manufacturing industry), the department may remove the requirement under regulation for opacity monitors where an emissions source is already subject to particulate matter emissions limitations under Federal law, provided the cement plant has particulate matter monitors for the subject sources.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0435PN0407 - 2 - 1234567891011